test/src/gt-desc-yamls/nouns_gt-desc.yaml
# gle/test/src/gt-desc-yamls/nouns_gt-desc.yaml

Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Nouns - cuid: # ok c 
    cuid+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg: coda
    spéir+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl: spéartha    
    feadaíl+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg: feadaíola
    greim+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg: greama
    tír+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl+DefArt: tíortha

  Verbalnouns: # ok elaine
    feadaíl+Verbal+Noun+VI+Gen: feadaíola
    tíoradh+Verbal+Noun+VT+Gen: tíortha
    ceangail+Verb+VT+FutInd: ceanglóidh
    
  Adjectives: # ok elaine
    fliuch+Adj+Fem+Gen+Sg: fliche
